Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2669.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Certified professional midwife -- Medicaid coverage.
(a) As used in this section, "certified professional midwife" or "CPM" means a trained
professional who has successfully completed an accredited educational program in midwifery,
holds a current certification as a certified professional midwife by the North American registry of
midwives (NARM), and is licensed to practice midwifery in accordance with § 23-13-9.
(b) The executive office of health and human services ("EOHHS") shall provide coverage
under the Medicaid program for services provided by a licensed certified professional midwife,
when such services are within the certified professional midwife’s lawful scope of practice and are
otherwise eligible for coverage under the Medicaid state plan or a waiver approved by the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(c) Reimbursement for services provided by a licensed certified professional midwife shall
be made in accordance with Medicaid reimbursement principles and methodologies applicable to
other maternity care providers for comparable services. No requirement for physician supervision,
signature, or referral shall be imposed unless such requirement is imposed on other providers for
the same service.
(d) The EOHHS shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this
section, including credentialing and enrollment requirements for certified professional midwives

participating as Medicaid providers.
(e) On or before July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the EOHHS shall collect and
maintain data on utilization and expenditures related to services provided by certified professional
midwives to Medicaid beneficiaries.
(f) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
the provisions of this section shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent
laws, including general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005520
========
LC005520 - Page 2 of 3